test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imashkimodenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imashkimodenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imashkimodenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imashkimodenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imashkimodenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imashkimodenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imashkimodenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imashkimodenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imashkimodensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imashkimodensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imashkimodensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imashkimodensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imashkimodensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imashkimodensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imashkimodensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imashkimodensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imashkimodensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imashkimodensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imashkimodensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmashkimod+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imashkimodensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
